Hawaii statutes.
[§168-7] Construction, when. No actual
construction of the physical features of a project shall be undertaken unless
(1) lands or interests in lands deemed by the board of agriculture to be
necessary for the construction and operation of the major features of the
project works have been secured, or negotiations therefor have been initiated
and it is indicated that the lands or interests in lands can be secured, at
prices satisfactory to the board; and (2) the board has found (A) that water
rights adequate for the purposes of the project have been acquired with titles
and at prices satisfactory to the board or have been initiated and can be
perfected in conformity with the law of the State and in a manner satisfactory
to the board, and (B) that the water rights can be utilized for the purposes of
the projects in a manner satisfactory to the board. [L 1987, c 306, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next